Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Use of Dead Human Bodies for Scientific Study.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5C M.J. Dead Bodies, § 5.

§ 32.1-298.
Notification of Commissioner and delivery of bodies.

Any person having charge or control of any dead human body that has been lawfully donated for scientific study shall notify the Commissioner whenever and as soon as any such body comes to his possession, charge, or control and shall, without fee or reward, permit the Commissioner or his agents to remove such body, to be used for the advancement of health science.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-356; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1979, c. 711; 2014, cc. 228, 583.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 228, effective March 7, 2014, substituted “that” for “which” in two places and deleted “which is required to be buried at the public expense” following “disposition.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 substituted “that” for “which is unclaimed for disposition, which is required to be buried at the public expense, or which.” The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For survey “Wills Trusts, and Estates,” see 50 U. Rich. L. Rev. 199 (2015).

§ 32.1-299.
Distribution of bodies.

The bodies received pursuant to §

32.1-298

shall be distributed by the Commissioner to institutions and individuals as they may be needed for the purposes of scientific education and training in health and related subjects as follows:

First, to the medical schools in Virginia;

Second, equitably to the several colleges and schools of this Commonwealth authorized by law to teach health science and issue diplomas and such physicians and surgeons as the Commissioner may designate;

Third, to colleges and schools in other states and the District of Columbia authorized by law to teach health science and issue diplomas.

Before any institution or individual may receive any body pursuant to this section, such institution or individual shall have given a bond to the Commonwealth in the penalty of $1,000 with condition that any body received shall be used only for scientific education and training in health and related subjects. Evidence of such bond shall be filed with the Commissioner.

All expenses incurred in the distribution and delivery of bodies pursuant to this section shall be paid by those receiving the bodies in such amount as may be prescribed by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner is authorized to employ carriers to effect the distribution of dead human bodies pursuant to this section. Any carrier so employed shall obtain a receipt by name or, if the name be unknown, by a description for each body delivered by him and shall deposit such receipt with the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-357, 32-358, 32-360, 32-363; 1976, c. 222; 1979, c. 711; 2014, c. 228.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 228, effective March 7, 2014, substituted “§

32.1-298

” for “§§

32.1-298

and 32.1-988” in the first sentence.

§ 32.1-300.
Records of bodies distributed.

The Commissioner shall keep a record of all bodies received and distributed, together with data pertaining to the disposition thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-355; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-301.
Burial, cremation, or return of bodies after scientific study.

After the bodies distributed pursuant to §

32.1-299

have been used for the purpose of instruction, they shall be decently interred or cremated by the institution or individual receiving them. However, if the decedent has stipulated in writing before his death that the cremated remains of his body, lawfully donated for scientific study, shall be returned to relatives for disposition after scientific study has been completed, or if the decedent’s next of kin, who lawfully donated the body for scientific study, requests in writing at the time of donation that the decedent’s cremated remains be returned to relatives after scientific study has been completed, the institution or individual that received the body shall return the decedent’s cremated remains to his next of kin or relatives. Any such writing shall acknowledge the responsibility to maintain the current name, address, and telephone number of the relatives to whom the decedent’s cremated remains are to be returned.

The written request of the decedent’s next of kin shall include the name of the next of kin, the current address to which the cremated remains shall be delivered, and the current telephone number of the next of kin or relatives where they may be contacted. The costs of transporting and delivering the cremated remains shall be borne by the institution or individual receiving the body. The institution or individual that received the decedent’s body and who has received such a written request shall not be obligated to return the decedent’s cremated remains if the name, address, and telephone number of the next of kin or relatives have not been provided in such written request or are no longer current.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-359; 1979, c. 711; 2000, c. 477; 2014, c. 583.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 477 rewrote the section, which formerly read: “After the bodies distributed pursuant to §

32.1-299

have been used for the purpose of instruction, they shall be decently interred or cremated by the institution or individual receiving them.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583 deleted “the office of the Chief Medical Examiner” following “requests” and “shall” following “remains” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

§ 32.1-302.
Importation of anatomical material.

The Commissioner may, in his discretion, on the application of any person, empower such person to import into this Commonwealth and traffic in such anatomical material and pathological specimens as the Commissioner may designate.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-362; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-303.
Penalty for trafficking in bodies.

Except as provided in §§

32.1-299

and

32.1-302

, if any person sell or buy any dead human body, or in any way traffic in the same, or transmit or convey, or procure in order to be transmitted or conveyed, any such body for the purpose of trafficking in the same to any place outside of this Commonwealth, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-361; 1976, c. 222; 1979, c. 711.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 32.1-304.
General penalty for violation.

If any person fail or refuse to perform any duty imposed upon him by this article, he shall, unless otherwise provided, be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-364; 1979, c. 711.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.